dev/gsoc2011/monodix/proper-noun/proper-noun.bn.dix
    <pardef n="আই__np_mf">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="al"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="al"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>য়ের</l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="al"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>য়ে</l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="al"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ইন__np_mf">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="al"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="al"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ের</l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="al"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ে</l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="al"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="হিউ__np_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>কে</l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>য়ের</l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="দুবাই__np_mf">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>য়ের</l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>য়ে</l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="এনজিও__np_mf">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="org"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="org"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>য়ের</l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="org"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>য়ে</l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="org"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="এপি__np_mf">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="org"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="org"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>র</l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="org"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>তে</l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="org"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="হাই__np_mf">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>কে</l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>য়ের</l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="সুন্দরবন__np_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ের</l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ে</l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>
  </pardefs>

    <e lm="হিউ"><i>হিউ</i><par n="হিউ__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="হাই"><i>হাই</i><par n="হাই__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="ইউনাইটেড"><i>ইউনাইটেড</i><par n="ইন__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="সুন্দরবন"><i>সুন্দরবন</i><par n="সুন্দরবন__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="আওয়ামী"><i>আওয়ামী</i><par n="এপি__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="ওয়েব"><i>ওয়েব</i><par n="ইন__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="জিলেট"><i>জিলেট</i><par n="ইন__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="মালাউই"><i>মালাউই</i><par n="দুবাই__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="মুম্বাই"><i>মুম্বাই</i><par n="দুবাই__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="বাফুফে"><i>বাফুফে</i><par n="এপি__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="ধামরাই"><i>ধামরাই</i><par n="দুবাই__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="এনডিএ"><i>এনডিএ</i><par n="আই__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="গোল্ড"><i>গোল্ড</i><par n="ইন__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="কমার্স"><i>কমার্স</i><par n="ইন__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="জাতীয়তাবাদী"><i>জাতীয়তাবাদী</i><par n="এপি__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="আই"><i>আই</i><par n="আই__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="প্রিমিয়ার"><i>প্রিমিয়ার</i><par n="ইন__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="এটিএন"><i>এটিএন</i><par n="ইন__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="ম্যাথিউ"><i>ম্যাথিউ</i><par n="হিউ__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="সংস্কৃত"><i>সংস্কৃত</i><par n="ইন__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="এনজিও"><i>এনজিও</i><par n="এনজিও__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="এক্সপ্লোরার"><i>এক্সপ্লোরার</i><par n="ইন__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="বিএনপি"><i>বিএনপি</i><par n="এপি__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="ম্যান"><i>ম্যান</i><par n="ইন__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="অ্যান্ড"><i>অ্যান্ড</i><par n="ইন__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="ফর"><i>ফর</i><par n="ইন__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="অ্যাশেজ"><i>অ্যাশেজ</i><par n="ইন__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="আবাহনী"><i>আবাহনী</i><par n="এপি__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="আইসিসি"><i>আইসিসি</i><par n="এপি__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="এপি"><i>এপি</i><par n="এপি__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="বেঙ্গল"><i>বেঙ্গল</i><par n="ইন__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="বিসিবি"><i>বিসিবি</i><par n="এপি__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="জগন্নাথ"><i>জগন্নাথ</i><par n="ইন__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="ব্রুনাই"><i>ব্রুনাই</i><par n="দুবাই__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="ফক্স"><i>ফক্স</i><par n="ইন__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="রমজান"><i>রমজান</i><par n="ইন__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="নিউ"><i>নিউ</i><par n="আই__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="ইংলিশ"><i>ইংলিশ</i><par n="ইন__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="সাংহাই"><i>সাংহাই</i><par n="দুবাই__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="ন্যাশনাল"><i>ন্যাশনাল</i><par n="ইন__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="ঠাকুরগাঁও"><i>ঠাকুরগাঁও</i><par n="দুবাই__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="দুবাই"><i>দুবাই</i><par n="দুবাই__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="এসআই"><i>এসআই</i><par n="হিউ__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="নাইকো"><i>নাইকো</i><par n="এপি__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="জেএমবি"><i>জেএমবি</i><par n="এপি__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="এএফপি"><i>এএফপি</i><par n="এপি__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="রেলওয়ে"><i>রেলওয়ে</i><par n="এপি__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="তেজগাঁও"><i>তেজগাঁও</i><par n="দুবাই__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="আহমদিয়া"><i>আহমদিয়া</i><par n="এপি__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="বসুন্ধরা"><i>বসুন্ধরা</i><par n="এপি__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="বিবিসি"><i>বিবিসি</i><par n="এপি__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="সিপিবি"><i>সিপিবি</i><par n="এপি__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="খিলগাঁও"><i>খিলগাঁও</i><par n="দুবাই__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="কাপ্তাই"><i>কাপ্তাই</i><par n="দুবাই__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="ওয়াসা"><i>ওয়াসা</i><par n="এপি__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="টাটা"><i>টাটা</i><par n="এপি__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="পন্টিং"><i>পন্টিং</i><par n="হিউ__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="সোনারগাঁও"><i>সোনারগাঁও</i><par n="দুবাই__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="সোনারগাঁ"><i>সোনারগাঁ</i><par n="দুবাই__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="ডিবি"><i>ডিবি</i><par n="এপি__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="এনটিভি"><i>এনটিভি</i><par n="এপি__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="বিজিএমইএ"><i>বিজিএমইএ</i><par n="এপি__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="সিআইডি"><i>সিআইডি</i><par n="এপি__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="বিটিভি"><i>বিটিভি</i><par n="এপি__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="এফবিসিসিআই"><i>এফবিসিসিআই</i><par n="এনজিও__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="ইইউ"><i>ইইউ</i><par n="এনজিও__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="স্পোর্টসসেন্টার"><i>স্পোর্টসসেন্টার</i><par n="ইন__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="আমন"><i>আমন</i><par n="ইন__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="শেরাটন"><i>শেরাটন</i><par n="ইন__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="এএসআই"><i>এএসআই</i><par n="হাই__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="মিরসরাই"><i>মিরসরাই</i><par n="দুবাই__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="হংকং"><i>হংকং</i><par n="দুবাই__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="আল-কায়েদা"><i>আল-কায়েদা</i><par n="এপি__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="উদীচী"><i>উদীচী</i><par n="এপি__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="ইউএস"><i>ইউএস</i><par n="ইন__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="উয়েফা"><i>উয়েফা</i><par n="এপি__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="সত্যজিৎ"><i>সত্যজিৎ</i><par n="হিউ__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="একুশ"><i>একুশ</i><par n="ইন__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="চার্চ"><i>চার্চ</i><par n="ইন__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="হাবল"><i>হাবল</i><par n="ইন__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="চেন্নাই"><i>চেন্নাই</i><par n="দুবাই__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="বৈশাখ"><i>বৈশাখ</i><par n="ইন__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="সেলসিয়াস"><i>সেলসিয়াস</i><par n="ইন__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="পাইথন"><i>পাইথন</i><par n="ইন__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="দার্জিলিং"><i>দার্জিলিং</i><par n="দুবাই__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="লুই"><i>লুই</i><par n="হিউ__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="রেশম"><i>রেশম</i><par n="ইন__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="অগাস্ট"><i>অগাস্ট</i><par n="ইন__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="বৈষ্ণব"><i>বৈষ্ণব</i><par n="ইন__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="ফ্লেমিং"><i>ফ্লেমিং</i><par n="হিউ__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ইউনিকোড"><i>ইউনিকোড</i><par n="ইন__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="ইয়ং"><i>ইয়ং</i><par n="হিউ__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="টুরিং"><i>টুরিং</i><par n="হিউ__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="চৈত্র"><i>চৈত্র</i><par n="ইন__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="হকিং"><i>হকিং</i><par n="হিউ__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ম্যান্ডারিন"><i>ম্যান্ডারিন</i><par n="ইন__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="ক্ষত্রিয়"><i>ক্ষত্রিয়</i><par n="ইন__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="ইউনেস্কো"><i>ইউনেস্কো</i><par n="এপি__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="ট্রয়"><i>ট্রয়</i><par n="দুবাই__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="বিশ্বভারতী"><i>বিশ্বভারতী</i><par n="এপি__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="রবীন্দ্রসংগীত"><i>রবীন্দ্রসংগীত</i><par n="ইন__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="কুরাইশ"><i>কুরাইশ</i><par n="ইন__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="সামুরাই"><i>সামুরাই</i><par n="হিউ__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ইউনিক্স"><i>ইউনিক্স</i><par n="ইন__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="ফিনিক্স"><i>ফিনিক্স</i><par n="ইন__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="থাই"><i>থাই</i><par n="হাই__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="আফ্রিকান্স"><i>আফ্রিকান্স</i><par n="ইন__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="বাস্কেটবল"><i>বাস্কেটবল</i><par n="ইন__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="জিরাফ"><i>জিরাফ</i><par n="ইন__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="এমআইটি"><i>এমআইটি</i><par n="এপি__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="অ্যামবিগ্রাম"><i>অ্যামবিগ্রাম</i><par n="ইন__np_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="শাহ্"><i>শাহ্</i><par n="হিউ__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ফারাও"><i>ফারাও</i><par n="হিউ__np_m"/></e>
